Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-412 Adjustment and refund.
The commissioner may:

(1) Adjust any rate to reflect any excess premiums
charged during any premium year, or in any subsequent premium year; and

(2) Order a refund to any class. [L 1987, c 347, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next